Louisiana, session 2026, HB279.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Code of Criminal Procedure Article 779(A) is hereby amended and
reenacted to read as follows:
Art. 779. Trial of misdemeanors
A. A defendant charged with a misdemeanor in which the punishment, as set
forth in the statute defining the offense, may be a fine in excess of one two thousand
five hundred dollars or imprisonment for more than six months shall be tried by a
jury of six jurors, all of whom must shall concur to render a verdict.
* * *
Section 2. The provisions of this Act shall apply both prospectively and retroactively
and shall be applied to all cases pending on the effective date of this Act.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1052 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 279